Maryland, session 2025, HB0120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
12–106.
NOTWITHSTANDING MARYLAND RULE 2–202, A MINOR WHO IS THE LEGAL
AND CUSTODIAL PARENT OF A CHILD HAS THE CAPACITY AND RIGHT TO FILE AN
ACTION FOR CHILD SUPPORT, WHETHER PENDENTE LITE OR PERMANENTLY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0120*